New York, session 2025-2026, S659.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 71-4003 of the environmental conservation law, as 2 amended by chapter 99 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 71-4003. General civil penalty. 5 Except as otherwise specifically provided elsewhere in this chapter, a 6 person who violates any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regu- 7 lation or order promulgated pursuant thereto, or the terms or conditions 8 of any permit, certificate or order issued thereunder, shall be liable 9 [to] for a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars, and an 10 additional civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each 11 day during which each such violation continues; and in addition thereto, 12 such person may be enjoined from continuing such violation, and any 13 permit or certificate issued to such person may be revoked or suspended, 14 or a pending renewal application may be denied. Any civil penalty, 15 injunctive relief, or permit or certificate revocation, suspension or 16 denial provided for by this [chapter] section may be assessed following 17 a hearing or opportunity to be heard. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00789-01-5